Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-182
Sherman.

The county of Sherman is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township thirteen, north, of range sixteen, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township thirteen, north, of range thirteen, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township sixteen, north, of range thirteen, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township sixteen, north, of range sixteen, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 49, p. 221;

R.S.1913, § 897;

C.S.1922, § 799;

C.S.1929, § 25-186;

R.S.1943, § 22-182.